Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.170

Graduation ceremony.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5253-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district that operates a high school shall establish a policy and procedures that permit any student who is receiving special education or related services under an individualized education program pursuant to state and federal law and who will continue to receive such services between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to participate in the graduation ceremony and activities after four years of high school attendance with his or her age-appropriate peers and receive a certificate of attendance.

(2) Participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a certificate of attendance under this section does not preclude a student from continuing to receive special education and related services under an individualized education program beyond the graduation ceremony.

(3) A student's participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a certificate of attendance under this section shall not be construed as the student's receipt of a high school diploma pursuant to RCW 28A.230.120.

[ 2019 c 252 s 106; 2007 c 318 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Findings—2007 c 318: "The legislature finds:

(1) There are students with disabilities throughout the state of Washington who have attended four years of high school, but whose individualized education programs prescribe the continuation of special education and related services beyond the fourth year of high school;

(2) Through their participation in the public schools and the community, students with disabilities have frequently become identified with and connected to a class of typically developing, age-appropriate peers who will graduate in four years and participate in a high school graduation ceremony;

(3) A high school graduation ceremony is an important rite of passage for students regardless of their abilities or limitations; and

(4) There is significant value in recognizing students' attendance and accomplishments in their individualized education programs and in allowing students with disabilities to participate in high school graduation ceremonies and activities with their age-appropriate peers without the forfeiture of their continuing special education and related services." [ 2007 c 318 s 1.]

Short title—2007 c 318: "This act may be known and cited as Kevin's law." [ 2007 c 318 s 3.]

Effective date—2007 c 318: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 4, 2007]." [ 2007 c 318 s 4.]